District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.12

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of any series of bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of this transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 13, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.12.